California statutes. Corporations Code
(4) Any natural person whose gross income exceeds three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per year in each of the two most recent years, or whose joint gross income with that person’s spouse exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per year in each of those years, and who reasonably expects to reach the same income level in the current year.

(5) Any entity, in which all of the equity owners are persons or entities described in either paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4).

(b) Each and every purchaser of the franchise has knowledge and experience in financial and business matters, either alone or with professional advisers of the purchaser who are unaffiliated with, and not directly or indirectly compensated by, the franchisor or an affiliate or selling agent of the franchisor, such that the franchisor reasonably believes, based on reasonable inquiry before the sale, that each and every purchaser has the capacity to evaluate the merits and risks of, and protect their own interests in, the franchise investment.

(c) Each and every purchaser of the franchise purchases the franchise for the purchaser’s own account, or a trust account if the purchaser is a trustee, for the purpose of conducting the business as a franchise and not with a view to, or for a sale in connection with, any resale or distribution of the franchise or any interest in the franchise.

(d) The immediate cash payment required from a purchaser of the franchise who is a natural person, upon the purchase of the franchise, shall not exceed 10 percent of that person’s net worth or joint net worth with that person’s spouse, exclusive of that person’s personal residence, any and all retirement or pension accounts or benefits, home furnishings and automobiles.

(e) The franchisor files with the commissioner a notice of exemption and pays the fee prescribed in subdivision (f) of Section 31500 prior to any offer or sale of a franchise in this state for which the exemption is claimed during any calendar year in which one or more franchises are sold, excluding any material modification.

(f) No franchisor or any of its officers, directors, employees, or agents shall form, organize, engage, or assist any person to purchase a franchise for resale or distribution to avoid the registration requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 458, Sec. 3.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Operative January 1, 2005, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 458.)
-------------------------------------------

31109.1.

(a) There shall be exempted from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110) the offer and sale of a franchise registered under Section 31111, 31121, or 31123 on terms different from the terms of the offer registered thereunder if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The initial offer is the offer registered under Section 31111, 31121, or 31123.

(2) The prospective franchisee receives all of the following in a separate written appendix to the franchise disclosure document:

(A) A summary description of
 each material negotiated term that was negotiated by the franchisor for a California franchise during the 12-month period ending in the calendar month immediately preceding the month in which the negotiated offer or sale is made under this section.

(B) A statement indicating that copies of the negotiated terms are available upon written request.

(C) The name, telephone number, and address of the representative of the franchisor to whom requests for a copy of the negotiated terms may be obtained.

(3) The franchisor certifies or declares in an appendix to its application for renewal that it has complied with all of the requirements of this section, in the event this exemption is claimed.

(4) The negotiated terms, on the whole, confer additional benefits on the franchisee.

(b) The franchisor shall provide a copy of the negotiated terms described in subdivision (a) to the prospective franchisee within five business days following the request of the franchisee.

(c) The franchisor shall maintain copies of all material negotiated terms for which this exemption is claimed for a period of five years from the effective date of the first agreement containing the relevant negotiated term. Upon the request of the commissioner, the franchisor shall make the copies available to the commissioner for review. For purposes of this section, the commissioner may prescribe by rule or order the format and content of the
 summary description of the negotiated terms required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) For purposes of this section, “material” means that a reasonable franchisee would view the terms as important in negotiating the franchise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 3.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Disclosure [31110. - 31126.]

31110.

On and after April 15, 1971, it shall be unlawful for any person to offer or sell any franchise in this state unless the offer of the franchise has been registered under this part or exempted under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 31100) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31111.

(a) The application for registration of an offer shall be filed with the commissioner upon the Uniform Franchise Registration Application, as identified, modified, and supplemented by rule of the commissioner.

(b) An authorization for the commissioner to examine the registrant’s financial records of the sale of the franchise pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code shall be filed with the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1026, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

31112.

Any application or amendment under this law shall be signed and verified by the franchisor or by the subfranchisor. Such verification shall be in the same manner provided in the Code of Civil Procedure for the verification of pleadings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 562, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

31113.

If the commissioner finds that it is necessary and appropriate for the protection of prospective franchisees or subfranchisors because the applicant has failed to demonstrate that adequate financial arrangements have been made to fulfill the franchisor’s obligations to provide real estate, improvements, equipment, inventory, training, or other items included in the offering, the commissioner may by rule or order require the escrow or impound of franchisee fees and other funds paid by the franchisee or subfranchisor until such obligations have been satisfied. At the option of the franchisor, the franchisor may furnish a surety bond as provided by rule of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 195.)
-------------------------------------------

31114.

The application for registration shall be accompanied by a proposed franchise disclosure document, which shall contain the material information set forth in the application for registration, as specified by rule of the commissioner, and such additional disclosures as the commissioner may require. The franchise disclosure document shall recite in bold type of not less than 10-point type that registration does not constitute approval, recommendation, or endorsement by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 4.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

31115.

The commissioner may summarily issue a stop order denying the effectiveness of or suspending or revoking effectiveness of any registration if the commissioner finds any of the following:

(a) That there has been a failure to comply with any of the provisions of this law or the rules of the commissioner pertaining thereto.

(b) That the offer or sale of the franchise would constitute misrepresentation to, or deceit or fraud of the purchasers, or that, in the case of a franchise other than a subfranchise, a major inducement to prospective franchisees is fees or other compensation from participation in the sale of additional franchises.

(c) That the applicant has
 failed to comply with any rule or order of the commissioner issued pursuant to Section 31113.

(d) That any person identified in the application or any officer or director of the franchisor, whether or not identified in the application, meets one or more of the following conditions, and the involvement of this person in the sale or management of the franchise creates an unreasonable risk to prospective franchisees:

(1) Has been convicted of a felony, or pleaded nolo contendere to a felony charge, or held liable in a civil action by final judgment if the felony or civil action involved fraud, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of property.

(2) Is subject to any currently effective order of the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or the securities administrator of any state denying
 registration to or revoking or suspending the registration of the person as a securities broker or dealer or investment adviser or is subject to any currently effective order of any national securities association or national securities exchange (as defined in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934) suspending or expelling the person from membership in the association or exchange.

(3) Is subject to any currently effective order or ruling of the Federal Trade Commission.

(4) Is subject to any currently effective injunctive or restrictive order relating to business activity as a result of an action brought by any public agency or department, including, without limitation, actions affecting a license as a real estate broker or sales person.

(e) The franchisor’s method of business includes or would include activities that
 are or would be illegal where performed.

(f) The franchise agreement contains a provision that is contrary to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 7.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

31116.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if no stop order under Section 31115 is in effect under this law, registration of the offer of franchises automatically becomes effective at 12 p.m., California time, of the 30th business day after the filing of a complete application for registration or the last preeffective amendment thereto, or at an earlier time that the commissioner determines.

(b) With respect to any application for registration or the last amendment thereto filed between January 1, 1971, and March 15, 1971, if no stop order under Section 31115 is in effect under this law, registration becomes effective on April 15, 1971; with respect to any application filed after March 15, 1971, and before May 10, 1971, if
 no stop order under Section 31115 is in effect under this law, registration becomes effective on June 1, 1971, or the 15th business day after the filing, whichever is the later, or at an earlier time that the commissioner determines.

(c) For purposes of this section, “complete application” means an application that contains the appropriate filing fee, Uniform Franchise Disclosure Document, and all additional exhibits, including financial statements in conformity with regulations of the commissioner. “Preeffective amendment” means an amendment to an application that is filed before the effective date of the registration of the sale of franchises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 48.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

31117.

Upon the entry of a stop order under Section 31115 the commissioner shall promptly notify the applicant that it has been entered and of the reasons therefor and that upon receipt of written request the matter will be set down for hearing to commence within 15 business days after such receipt unless the applicant consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 30 days after receipt of the notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the order will remain in effect until it is modified or vacated by the commissioner. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the commissioner, after notice and hearing in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, in connection with which the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted thereunder, may modify or vacate the order or extend it until its final determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 562, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

31118.

The commissioner may vacate or modify a stop order if he or she finds that the conditions which caused its entry have changed or that it is otherwise in the public interest to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 7.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31119.

(a) It is unlawful to sell any franchise in this state that is subject to registration under this law without first providing to the prospective franchisee, at least 14 days prior to the execution by the prospective franchisee of any binding franchise or other agreement, or at least 14 days prior to the receipt of any consideration, whichever occurs first, a copy of the franchise disclosure document, together with a copy of all proposed agreements relating to the sale of the franchise.

(b) Nothing in this division shall be construed to prevent a franchisor from providing copies of the franchise disclosure documents to prospective franchisees through
 electronic means pursuant to any requirements or conditions that may be imposed by rule or order of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 5.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

31120.

A franchise offering shall be deemed duly registered for a period of one year from the effective date of the registration, unless the commissioner by order or rule specifies a different period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31121.

(a) The registration may be renewed for additional periods of one year each, unless the commissioner by rule or order specifies a different period, by submitting to the commissioner a renewal application before the expiration of the registration. If no stop order or other order under Section 31115 is in effect under this law, registration of the offer of the franchises automatically becomes renewed effective at 12 p.m., California time, of the 30th business day after the filing of a complete application for registration or the last preeffective amendment or at an earlier time that the commissioner determines.

(b) For purposes of this section, “complete application” means an application that contains the appropriate filing
 fee, Uniform Franchise Disclosure Document, and all additional exhibits, including financial statements in conformity with regulations of the commissioner. “Preeffective amendment” means an amendment to an application that is filed before the effective date of the registration of the sale of franchises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 49.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

31122.

The registration renewal statement shall be in the form and content prescribed by the commissioner, and shall be accompanied by a proposed offering prospectus. Each such registration renewal statement shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in Part 5 (commencing with Section 31500) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31123.

A franchisor shall promptly notify the commissioner in writing, by an application to amend the registration, of any material change in the information contained in the application as originally submitted, amended or renewed. The commissioner may by rule further define what shall be considered a material change for such purposes, and the circumstances under which a revised offering prospectus must accompany such application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31124.

An amendment to an application filed after the effective date of the registration of the sale of franchises, if such amendment is approved by the commissioner, shall become effective on such date as the commissioner may determine, having due regard for the public interest and the protection of franchisees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31125.

(a) An application for registration of a material modification of an existing franchise or of existing franchises shall be in a form and contain information as the commissioner may by rule prescribe, and shall be accompanied by a proposed disclosure form as specified in subdivision (b). The application may be included with an application pursuant to Section 31111 or 31121.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), it is unlawful to solicit the agreement of a franchisee to a proposed material modification of an existing franchise without first delivering to the franchisee a written disclosure, in a form and containing information as the commissioner may by rule or order require, identifying the proposed modification, either five business days prior to the execution of any binding agreement by the franchisee to the modification or containing a statement that the franchisee may, by written notice mailed or delivered to the franchisor or a specified agent of the franchisor within not less than five business days following the execution of the agreement, rescind the agreement to the material modification.

(c) Any modification of a franchise agreement with an existing franchisee of a franchisor shall be exempted from the provisions of this chapter, if all of the following are met:

(1) The franchisee receives the complete written modification at least five business days prior to the execution of a binding agreement, or providing that the franchisee may, by written notice mailed or delivered to the franchisor or a specified agent of the franchisor within not less than five business days following the execution of the agreement, rescind the agreement to the material modification; provided (A) the agreement is not executed within 12 months after the date of the franchise agreement, and (B) the modification does not waive any right of the franchisee under the California Franchise Relations Act (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code), but the modification may include a general release of all known and unknown claims by a party to the modification.

(2) The modification meets one of the following:

(A) The proposed modification is in connection with the resolution of a bona fide dispute between the franchisor and the franchisee or the resolution of a claimed or actual franchisee or franchisor default, and the modification is not applied on a franchise systemwide basis at or about the time the modification is executed. A modification shall not be deemed to be made on a franchise systemwide basis if it is offered on a voluntary basis to fewer than 25 percent of the franchisor’s California franchises within any 12-month period.

(B) The proposed modification is offered on a voluntary basis to fewer than 25 percent of the franchisor’s California franchises within any 12-month period, provided each franchisee is given a right to rescind the modification agreement if the modification is not made in compliance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(d) Any modification of a franchise agreement with an existing franchise of a franchisee shall be exempted from this chapter if the modification is offered on a voluntary basis and does not substantially and adversely impact the franchisee’s rights, benefits, privileges, duties, obligations, or responsibilities under the franchise agreement.

(e) For purposes of this section, “California franchise” means: (1) an existing franchise of a franchisee with any location in this state from which sales, leases, or other transactions between the franchised business and its customers are made or goods or services are distributed, or (2) an existing franchise of a franchisee that is a resident of this state and that owns, controls, or has an equity interest in the franchise.

(f) A franchisor shall not make modifications in consecutive years for the purpose of evading the 25 percent requirements set forth above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 458, Sec. 6.   Effective September 10, 2004.   Operative January 1, 2005, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 458.)
-------------------------------------------

31126.

(a) A prospective franchisee seeking to buy an existing franchise, all or substantially all of the assets of an existing franchise business, or an interest in an existing franchise business shall do all of the following when applying with the franchisor to buy that franchise, those assets, or that interest:

(1) Provide their name and address to the franchisor.

(2) Provide to the franchisor a copy of all agreements related to the sale, assignment, or transfer of the franchise, the assets of the franchise business, or the interest in the franchise business.

(3) Provide an application to the franchisor for approval of the
 transfer, which shall include all forms, financial disclosures, and related information required by the franchisor in reviewing prospective franchisees.

(b) (1) If a form or document required to be submitted with an application pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) is not reasonably available to the prospective franchisee, the prospective franchisee may make a written request for the form or document to the franchisor, and the franchisor shall deliver the form or document to the prospective franchisee by email, courier, or certified mail within 15 calendar days of receiving the request.

(2) If the franchisor’s then-existing standards for approval of an application required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) are not reasonably available to the prospective franchisee, the prospective franchisee may make a written request for the standards to the
 franchisor, and the franchisor shall communicate the standards to the prospective franchisee within 15 calendar days of receiving the request.

(c) As soon as practicable after receiving the application required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the franchisor shall notify the prospective franchisee in writing of any additional information or documentation necessary to complete the application.

(d) (1) The franchisor shall notify the prospective franchisee of the approval or disapproval of their application within 60 days after receiving the information and documentation required by subdivision (a) and requested by the franchisor pursuant to subdivision (c). The notice shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the prospective franchisee by email, courier, or certified mail. If the application is disapproved, the franchisor shall include in the notice a
 statement setting forth the reasons for the disapproval.

(2) In any legal action in which the franchisor’s disapproval of a sale, assignment, or transfer pursuant to this subdivision is an issue, the reasonableness of the franchisor’s decision shall be a question of fact requiring consideration of all relevant circumstances. However, nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit summary judgment when the reasonableness of the disapproval can be decided as a matter of law.

(e) This section neither prohibits a franchisor from exercising nor requires a franchisor to exercise a contractual right of first refusal to purchase an existing franchise, all or substantially all of the assets of an existing franchise business, or an interest in an existing franchise business.

(f) This section shall not be interpreted to prevent the
 franchisor, in connection with a proposed sale under subdivision (a), from requiring that the prospective franchisee and the prospective seller comply with the transfer conditions specified in the franchise agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 8.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Provisions [31150. - 31158.]

31150.

Every franchisor or subfranchisor offering franchises for sale in this state shall at all times keep and maintain a complete set of books, records, and accounts of such sales.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31151.

The commissioner may accept and act upon the opinions, appraisements and reports of any engineers, appraisers, or other experts which may be presented by an applicant or any interested party, on any question of fact concerning or affecting the franchises proposed to be offered and sold. In lieu of, or in addition to, such opinions, appraisements, and reports, the commissioner may have any or all matters concerning or affecting such franchises investigated, appraised, passed upon and certified to him by engineers, appraisers or other experts selected by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31152.

Any document filed under this law or under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 or a predecessor statute thereto may be incorporated by reference in a subsequent application filed under this law if it was filed within four years prior to the filing of such application, or is otherwise available in the files of the commissioner, to the extent that the document is currently accurate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31153.

In any proceeding under this law, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31154.

(a) Neither (1) the fact that an application for registration under this law has been filed, nor (2) the fact that such registration has become effective constitutes a finding by the commissioner that any document filed under this law is true, complete or not misleading. Neither any such fact nor the fact that an exemption is available for a transaction means that the commissioner has passed in any way upon the merits or qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, any person, franchise or transaction.

(b) It is unlawful to make or cause to be made to any prospective purchaser or offeree any representation inconsistent with subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31155.

Every applicant for registration of an offer to sell franchises under this law, by other than a California corporation, California limited partnership, or California limited liability company, shall file with the commissioner, in such form as he or she by rule prescribed, an irrevocable consent appointing the commissioner or his or her successor in office to be his or her attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action or proceeding against him or her or his or her successor, executor or administrator, which arises under this law or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent. A person who has filed such a consent in connection with a previous registration under this law
 need not file another. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the commissioner but it is not effective unless (a) the plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by him or her, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at his or her last address on file with the commissioner, and (b) the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this section is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 41.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31156.

No person shall publish in this state any advertisement offering a franchise subject to the registration requirements of this law unless a true copy of the advertisement has been filed in the office of the commissioner at least three business days prior to the first publication or such shorter period as the commissioner by rule or order may allow, or unless such advertisement has been exempted by rule of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31157.

No person shall publish any advertisement concerning any franchise in this state after the commissioner finds that the advertisement contains any statement that is false or misleading or omits to make any statement necessary in order to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading and so notifies the person in writing. Such notification may be given summarily without notice of hearing. At any time after the issuance of a notification under this section, the person desiring to use the advertisement may in writing request that the order be rescinded. Upon the receipt of such a written request, the matter shall be set down for hearing to commence within 15 business days after such receipt unless the person making the request consents to a later date. After such hearing, which shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the commissioner shall determine whether to affirm and continue or to rescind such order, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted under such act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 539.)
-------------------------------------------

31158.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may by rule or order prescribe circumstances under which to accept electronic records or electronic signatures. This section does not require the commissioner to accept electronic records or electronic signatures.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Electronic record” means an initial registration application, registration renewal statement, preeffective amendment, posteffective amendment, or material modification and any other record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means. “Electronic record” also includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) An application, amendment, supplement, and exhibit, filed for any registration, order, license, consent, or other authority.

(B) A financial statement, report, or advertising.

(C) An order, license, consent, or other authority.

(D) A notice of public hearing, accusation, and statement of issues in connection with any application, registration, order, license, consent, or other authority.

(E) A proposed decision of a hearing officer and a decision of the commissioner.

(F) The transcripts of a hearing.

(G) A release, newsletter, interpretive opinion,
 determination, or specific ruling.

(H) Correspondence between a party and the commissioner directly relating to any document listed in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(2) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation has continuously implemented methods to accept records filed electronically, including broker-dealer and investment adviser applications, and is encouraged to continue to expand its use of electronic filings to the extent feasible, as budget, resources, and equipment are made available to accomplish that
 goal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 92.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 3. FRAUDULENT AND PROHIBITED PRACTICES [31200. - 31221.]



  CHAPTER 1. Fraudulent Practices [31200. - 31204.]

31200.

It is unlawful for any person willfully to make any untrue statement of a material fact in any application, notice or report filed with the commissioner under this law, or willfully to omit to state in any such application, notice, or report any material fact which is required to be stated therein, or fail to notify the commissioner of any material change as required by Section 31123.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31201.

It is unlawful for any person to offer or sell a franchise in this state by means of any written or oral communication not enumerated in Section 31200 which includes an untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31202.

It is unlawful for any person willfully to make any untrue statement of a material fact in any statement required to be disclosed in writing pursuant to Section 31101, or willfully to omit to state in any such statement any material fact which is required to be stated therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31203.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any order of the commissioner or condition to the effectiveness of the registration of the offer or sale of franchises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

31204.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly alter, destroy, mutilate, conceal, cover up, falsify, or make a false entry in any record, document, or tangible object with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make an untrue statement to the commissioner during the course of licensing, investigation, or examination, with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Prohibited Practices [31210. - 31212.]

31210.

It is unlawful for any person to effect or attempt to effect a sale of a franchise in this state, except in transactions exempted under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 31100) of Part 2 of this division, unless that person is any of the following:

(a) Identified in Item 2 of a franchise disclosure document submitted with an application or amended application filed with the commissioner pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section
 31100) of this division.

(b) Licensed by the Department of Real Estate as a real estate broker or real estate salesperson.

(c) Licensed by the commissioner as a broker-dealer or agent pursuant to the Corporate Securities Law of 1968.

(d) Registered as a franchise broker pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 31520).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 518, Sec. 2.   (SB 919)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

31211.

If in the opinion of the commissioner any person is acting in violation of Section 31210, the commissioner may order such person to desist and refrain from further activity. If, after such an order has been made, a request for a hearing is filed in writing by the person to whom such order was directed, a hearing shall be held in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted thereunder; unless such hearing is commenced within 15 business days after the request is made (or the person affected consents to a later date), such order shall be deemed rescinded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 539.)
-------------------------------------------

31212.

No franchisor shall refuse to grant a franchise, or refuse to provide financial assistance, to a franchisee or prospective franchisee that has been granted or provided to other similarly situated franchisees or prospective franchisees based solely on any characteristic of the franchisee or prospective franchisee, or any characteristic of the composition of the neighborhood or geographic area where the franchise is located or the proposed franchise would be located, listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit a franchisor from granting a franchise to a prospective franchisee as part of a program to make franchises available to persons lacking the capital, training, business experience, or other qualifications ordinarily required of franchisees,
 or any other affirmative action program adopted by the franchisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 9.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Unfair Practices [31220. - 31221.]

31220.

It shall be a violation of this division for any franchisor, directly or indirectly, through any officer, agent or employee, to restrict or inhibit the right of franchisees to join a trade association or to prohibit the right of free association among franchisees for any lawful purposes. Notwithstanding Section 31410, a violation of this section shall not constitute a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 510.)
-------------------------------------------

31221.

It shall be a violation of this division for any franchisor, directly or indirectly, through any officer, agent, or employee, to violate the provisions of Section 31126.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 10.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 4. ENFORCEMENT [31300. - 31420.]



  CHAPTER 1. Civil Liability [31300. - 31306.]

31300.

(a) Any person who offers or sells a franchise in violation of Section 31101, 31110, 31119, 31200, or 31202, or in violation of any provision of this division that provides an exemption from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31110) of Part 2 or any portions of Part 2, shall be liable to the franchisee or subfranchisor, who may sue for damages caused thereby, and if the violation is willful, the franchisee may also sue for rescission, unless, in the case of a violation of Section 31200 or 31202, the defendant proves that the plaintiff knew the facts concerning the untruth or omission, or that the defendant exercised reasonable care and did not know, or, if they had exercised reasonable
 care, would not have known, of the untruth or omission.

(b) (1) Any franchise broker who offers or sells a franchise in violation of Part 7 (commencing with Section 31520) or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 31200) of Part 3 shall be liable to the franchisee, who may sue for damages caused thereby.

(2) Any franchise broker who offers or sells a franchise in violation of Part 7